Connecticut, session 2026, HB05294.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 27-1 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
All [male citizens and all male residents of the state who have
declared their intention to become citizens of the United States,] persons
between the ages of eighteen and forty-five years [,] who are citizens, or
who are residents of the state and have declared their intention to
become citizens of the United States, and who are not exempt by law,
shall be subject to military duty and designated as the militia. [All
female citizens and all female residents of the state who have declared
their intention to become citizens of the United States, between the ages
of eighteen and forty-five years, may enlist voluntarily in any women's
unit of the armed forces of the state.]
Sec. 2. Section 27-2 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The militia shall be divided into four classes as follows: The
unorganized militia, the organized militia, the National Guard and the
naval militia. The National Guard for the purposes of this chapter shall
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5294
consist of the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard. The
unorganized militia shall consist of all [male citizens and all male
residents of the state who have declared their intention to become
citizens of the United States, between the ages of eighteen and forty-five
years, not exempt from military duty by federal or state laws or by such
reasons of physical or mental disabilities as shall be prescribed in
general orders or regulations published by the Adjutant General and
approved by the Governor and who are not members of the organized
militia or of the National Guard or of the naval militia, and all female
citizens and all female residents of the state who have declared their
intention to become citizens of the United States, between the ages of
eighteen and forty-five years, who may voluntarily offer their services
to the state] persons between the ages of eighteen and forty-five years
who are citizens, or who are residents of the state and have declared
their intention to become citizens of the United States, who are not
exempt from military duty by law and who are not members of any
other of such classes. The organized militia shall consist of the
Governor's Guards, the State Guard and such other military forces as
may be designated by the Governor as commander-in-chief, which may
hereafter be organized under the provisions of the laws of this state. The
National Guard shall consist of such forces as may be organized and
maintained by this state pursuant to the laws and regulations of the
United States relating to the National Guard. The naval militia shall
consist of such persons as may enlist or be appointed or commissioned
therein as a special force for coast protection and as a naval reserve and
shall be organized and maintained by this state pursuant to the laws and
regulations of the United States relating to the naval militia and may
include a marine corps branch of the naval militia subordinate thereto
in all matters pertaining to command, discipline or administration. The
organized militia, the National Guard, the naval militia and marine
corps branch of the naval militia, whenever organized, shall be, for all
purposes under the general statutes, the armed forces of the state.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5294
Section 1 October 1, 2026 27-1
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 27-2
VA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3